Massachusetts, session 194th, H917.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 21O the following
chapter:
CHAPTER 21P: The Sustainable Food Service Ware Act.
Section 1. Definitions
“Compostable” refers to (i) a product comprised of wood or fiber-based substrate only; or
(ii) bioplastic materials that meet the American Society for Testing and Materials International
Standards D6400 or D6868, as those standards may be amended, or international equivalents.
ASTM D6400 is the specification for plastics designed for compostability in municipal or
industrial aerobic composting facilities. D6868 is the specification for aerobic compostability of
of 3

plastics used as coatings on a compostable substrate. A bioplastic product must use a logo
indicating the product has been certified by a recognized third-party independent verification
body as meeting the ASTM standard specification; and displays the word "compostable," where
possible indicating the product has been tested by a recognized third-party independent body and
meets the ASTM standard specification. Fiber-based products or product components would
need to be (a) free from any organic fluorine substances that a manufacturer has intentionally
added in any amount; and (b) not contain total organic fluorine at or above 100 parts per million
as measured by an independent laboratory.
“Disposable food service ware” All food and beverage containers, bowls, plates, trays,
cartons, cups, lids, straws, stirrers, forks, spoons, knives, film wrap, and other items designed for
one-time or non-durable uses on or in which any food vendor directly places or packages
prepared foods or which are used to consume foods. This includes, but is not limited to, service
ware for takeout foods and leftovers from partially consumed meals prepared at food
establishments.
“Food establishment” An operation that stores, prepares, packages, serves, vends, or
otherwise provides food for human consumption. This includes without limitation restaurants
and food trucks.
“Recyclable Material” that can be sorted, cleansed, and reconstituted using the local
municipality’s regular year-round collection program for the purpose of using the altered form in
the manufacture of a new product. Regular year-round collection means either the municipal
curbside pickup or else a municipal transfer station in communities that do not have curbside
pickup. All recyclable plastic material must be identified by its plastic resin code in a visible
of 3

manner on the food service ware. "Recycling" does not include burning, incinerating, converting,
or otherwise thermally destroying solid waste.
“Reusable Products” Those that will be used more than once in its same form by a food
establishment. Reusable food service ware includes: tableware, flatware, food or beverage
containers, packages or trays, such as, but not limited to, soft drink bottles and milk containers
that are designed to be returned to the store or distributor that provided the take-out containers.
Reusable materials include aluminum and glass. Reusable also includes cleanable durable
containers, packages, or trays used on-premises or returnable containers brought back to the food
establishment.
Section 2. (a) Except as provided in this section on and after January 1, 2027, all retail
food establishments will use food service ware that is compostable, recyclable, or reusable for
any food prepared or packaged on premises.
(b) The Department of Environmental Protection shall promulgate regulations with
regard to the enforcement of this chapter.
of 3